isv_lat_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX Bd Y 80
SFX Bd ti l .
SFX Bd ti la .
SFX Bd ti lo .
SFX Bd ti li .
SFX Bd ti nu .
SFX Bd ti nem .
SFX Bd ti neš .
SFX Bd ti ne .
SFX Bd ti nemo .
SFX Bd ti nete .
SFX Bd ti nut .
SFX Bd ti h .
SFX Bd ti še .
SFX Bd ti hmo .
SFX Bd ti ste .
SFX Bd ti hu .
SFX Bd ti ni .
SFX Bd ti nimo .
SFX Bd ti nite .
SFX Bd ti nuči .
SFX Bd ti nučego .
SFX Bd ti nučemu .
SFX Bd ti nučim .
SFX Bd ti nučem .
SFX Bd ti nučih .
SFX Bd ti nučimi .
SFX Bd ti nuča .
SFX Bd ti nuču .
SFX Bd ti nučej .
SFX Bd ti nučeju .
SFX Bd ti nuče .
SFX Bd ti nemy .
SFX Bd ti nemogo .
SFX Bd ti nemomu .
SFX Bd ti nemym .
SFX Bd ti nemom .
SFX Bd ti nemo .
SFX Bd ti nema .
SFX Bd ti nemu .
SFX Bd ti nemoj .
SFX Bd ti nemoju .
SFX Bd ti nemi .
SFX Bd ti neme .
SFX Bd ti nemyh .
SFX Bd ti nemym .
SFX Bd ti nemymi .
SFX Bd ti vši .
SFX Bd ti všego .
SFX Bd ti všemu .
SFX Bd ti všim .
SFX Bd ti všem .
SFX Bd ti vših .
SFX Bd ti všimi .
SFX Bd ti vša .
SFX Bd ti všu .
SFX Bd ti všej .
SFX Bd ti všeju .
SFX Bd ti vše .
SFX Bd ti ny .
SFX Bd ti nogo .
SFX Bd ti nomu .
SFX Bd ti nym .
SFX Bd ti nom .
SFX Bd ti ni .
SFX Bd ti ne .
SFX Bd ti nyh .
SFX Bd ti nymi .
SFX Bd ti na .
SFX Bd ti nu .
SFX Bd ti noj .
SFX Bd ti noju .
SFX Bd ti no .
SFX Bd ti nje .
SFX Bd ti nja .
SFX Bd ti nju .
SFX Bd ti njem .
SFX Bd ti nij .
SFX Bd ti njam .
SFX Bd ti njami .
SFX Bd ti njah .

SFX Be Y 62
SFX Be ti l .
SFX Be ti la .
SFX Be ti lo .
SFX Be ti li .
SFX Be zeti ozmu .
SFX Be zeti ozmem .
SFX Be zeti ozmeš .
SFX Be zeti ozme .
SFX Be zeti ozmemo .
SFX Be zeti ozmete .
SFX Be zeti ozmut .
SFX Be ti h .
SFX Be ti še .
SFX Be ti hmo .
SFX Be ti ste .
SFX Be ti hu .
SFX Be zeti ozmi .
SFX Be zeti ozmimo .
SFX Be zeti ozmite .
SFX Be zeti ozmuči .
SFX Be zeti ozmučego .
SFX Be zeti ozmučemu .
SFX Be zeti ozmučim .
SFX Be zeti ozmučem .
SFX Be zeti ozmučih .
SFX Be zeti ozmučimi .
SFX Be zeti ozmuča .
SFX Be zeti ozmuču .
SFX Be zeti ozmučej .
SFX Be zeti ozmučeju .
SFX Be zeti ozmuče .
SFX Be zeti ozmemy .
SFX Be zeti ozmemogo .
SFX Be zeti ozmemomu .
SFX Be zeti ozmemym .
SFX Be zeti ozmemom .
SFX Be zeti ozmemo .
SFX Be zeti ozmema .
SFX Be zeti ozmemu .
SFX Be zeti ozmemoj .
SFX Be zeti ozmemoju .
SFX Be zeti ozmemi .
SFX Be zeti ozmeme .
SFX Be zeti ozmemyh .
SFX Be zeti ozmemym .
SFX Be zeti ozmemymi .
SFX Be ti vši .
SFX Be ti všego .
SFX Be ti všemu .
SFX Be ti všim .
SFX Be ti všem .
SFX Be ti vših .
SFX Be ti všimi .
SFX Be ti vša .
SFX Be ti všu .
SFX Be ti všej .
SFX Be ti všeju .
SFX Be ti vše .
SFX Be i y .
SFX Be i a .
SFX Be i o .
SFX Be i je .

SFX Bf Y 100
SFX Bf  se 0 .
SFX Bf ti se l .
SFX Bf ti se la .
SFX Bf ti se lo .
SFX Bf ti se li .
SFX Bf ti se ju .
SFX Bf ti se m .
SFX Bf ti se ješ .
SFX Bf ti se š .
SFX Bf ti se je .
SFX Bf ti se 0 .
SFX Bf ti se jemo .
SFX Bf ti se mo .
SFX Bf ti se jete .
SFX Bf i se e .
SFX Bf ti se jut .
SFX Bf ti se h .
SFX Bf ti se še .
SFX Bf ti se hmo .
SFX Bf ti se ste .
SFX Bf ti se hu .
SFX Bf ti se j .
SFX Bf ti se jmo .
SFX Bf ti se jte .
SFX Bf ti se juči .
SFX Bf ti se jučego .
SFX Bf ti se jučemu .
SFX Bf ti se jučim .
SFX Bf ti se jučem .
SFX Bf ti se jučih .
SFX Bf ti se jučimi .
SFX Bf ti se juča .
SFX Bf ti se juču .
SFX Bf ti se jučej .
SFX Bf ti se jučeju .
SFX Bf ti se juče .
SFX Bf ti se jemy .
SFX Bf ti se jemogo .
SFX Bf ti se jemomu .
SFX Bf ti se jemym .
SFX Bf ti se jemom .
SFX Bf ti se jemo .
SFX Bf ti se jema .
SFX Bf ti se jemu .
SFX Bf ti se jemoj .
SFX Bf ti se jemoju .
SFX Bf ti se jemi .
SFX Bf ti se jeme .
SFX Bf ti se jemyh .
SFX Bf ti se jemym .
SFX Bf ti se jemymi .
SFX Bf ti se my .
SFX Bf ti se mogo .
SFX Bf ti se momu .
SFX Bf ti se mym .
SFX Bf ti se mom .
SFX Bf ti se mo .
SFX Bf ti se ma .
SFX Bf ti se mu .
SFX Bf ti se moj .
SFX Bf ti se moju .
SFX Bf ti se mi .
SFX Bf ti se me .
SFX Bf ti se myh .
SFX Bf ti se mym .
SFX Bf ti se mymi .
SFX Bf ti se vši .
SFX Bf ti se všego .
SFX Bf ti se všemu .
SFX Bf ti se všim .
SFX Bf ti se všem .
SFX Bf ti se vših .
SFX Bf ti se všimi .
SFX Bf ti se vša .
SFX Bf ti se všu .
SFX Bf ti se všej .
SFX Bf ti se všeju .
SFX Bf ti se vše .
SFX Bf ti se ny .
SFX Bf ti se nogo .
SFX Bf ti se nomu .
SFX Bf ti se nym .
SFX Bf ti se nom .
SFX Bf ti se ni .
SFX Bf ti se ne .
SFX Bf ti se nyh .
SFX Bf ti se nymi .
SFX Bf ti se na .
SFX Bf ti se nu .
SFX Bf ti se noj .
SFX Bf ti se noju .
SFX Bf ti se no .
SFX Bf ti se nje .
SFX Bf ti se nja .
SFX Bf ti se nju .
SFX Bf ti se njem .
SFX Bf ti se nij .
SFX Bf ti se njam .
SFX Bf ti se njami .
SFX Bf ti se njah .

SFX Bg Y 3
SFX Bg e ih .
SFX Bg e im .
SFX Bg e imi .

SFX Bh Y 13
SFX Bh i e .
SFX Bh i a .
SFX Bh i ego .
SFX Bh i u .
SFX Bh i ej .
SFX Bh i em .
SFX Bh i emu .
SFX Bh 0 m .
SFX Bh i eju .
SFX Bh 0 h .
SFX Bh 0 mi .
SFX Bh i ejši .
SFX Bh i eje .

SFX Bi Y 9
SFX Bi ot ti .
SFX Bi ot ta .
SFX Bi ot tov .
SFX Bi ot tu .
SFX Bi ot tah .
SFX Bi ot tam .
SFX Bi ot tom .
SFX Bi ot tami .
SFX Bi ot te .

SFX Bj Y 4
SFX Bj ok ka .
SFX Bj ok ku .
SFX Bj ok kom .
SFX Bj ok če .

SFX Bk Y 7
SFX Bk o a .
SFX Bk lo el .
SFX Bk o u .
SFX Bk o ah .
SFX Bk o am .
SFX Bk 0 m .
SFX Bk o ami .

SFX Bl Y 27
SFX Bl y o .
SFX Bl y a .
SFX Bl y ogo .
SFX Bl y u .
SFX Bl y oj .
SFX Bl y om .
SFX Bl y omu .
SFX Bl 0 m .
SFX Bl y oju .
SFX Bl y i .
SFX Bl y e .
SFX Bl 0 h .
SFX Bl 0 mi .
SFX Bl ky ši/zz .
SFX Bl ky šego .
SFX Bl ky šemu .
SFX Bl ky šim .
SFX Bl ky šem .
SFX Bl ky še .
SFX Bl ky ša .
SFX Bl ky šu .
SFX Bl ky šej .
SFX Bl ky šeju .
SFX Bl ky ših .
SFX Bl ky šim .
SFX Bl ky šimi .
SFX Bl ky še .

SFX Bm Y 68
SFX Bm ti l .
SFX Bm ti la .
SFX Bm ti lo .
SFX Bm ti li .
SFX Bm ziti žu .
SFX Bm ti m .
SFX Bm ti š .
SFX Bm ti 0 .
SFX Bm ti mo .
SFX Bm i e .
SFX Bm iti et .
SFX Bm ti h .
SFX Bm ti še .
SFX Bm ti hmo .
SFX Bm ti ste .
SFX Bm ti hu .
SFX Bm iti eči .
SFX Bm iti eča .
SFX Bm iti eče .
SFX Bm ti my .
SFX Bm ti mogo .
SFX Bm ti momu .
SFX Bm ti mym .
SFX Bm ti mom .
SFX Bm ti mo .
SFX Bm ti ma .
SFX Bm ti mu .
SFX Bm ti moj .
SFX Bm ti moju .
SFX Bm ti mi .
SFX Bm ti me .
SFX Bm ti myh .
SFX Bm ti mym .
SFX Bm ti mymi .
SFX Bm ti vši .
SFX Bm ti všego .
SFX Bm ti všemu .
SFX Bm ti všim .
SFX Bm ti všem .
SFX Bm ti vših .
SFX Bm ti všimi .
SFX Bm ti vša .
SFX Bm ti všu .
SFX Bm ti všej .
SFX Bm ti všeju .
SFX Bm ti vše .
SFX Bm ziti ženy .
SFX Bm ziti ženogo .
SFX Bm ziti ženomu .
SFX Bm ziti ženym .
SFX Bm ziti ženom .
SFX Bm ziti ženi .
SFX Bm ziti žene .
SFX Bm ziti ženyh .
SFX Bm ziti ženymi .
SFX Bm ziti žena .
SFX Bm ziti ženu .
SFX Bm ziti ženoj .
SFX Bm ziti ženoju .
SFX Bm ziti ženo .
SFX Bm ziti ženje .
SFX Bm ziti ženja .
SFX Bm ziti ženju .
SFX Bm ziti ženjem .
SFX Bm ziti ženij .
SFX Bm ziti ženjam .
SFX Bm ziti ženjami .
SFX Bm ziti ženjah .

SFX Bn Y 13
SFX Bn in no .
SFX Bn in na .
SFX Bn in nogo .
SFX Bn in nu .
SFX Bn in noj .
SFX Bn in nom .
SFX Bn in nomu .
SFX Bn in nym .
SFX Bn in noju .
SFX Bn in ni .
SFX Bn in ne .
SFX Bn in nyh .
SFX Bn in nymi .

SFX Bo Y 9
SFX Bo ec ce .
SFX Bo ec ca .
SFX Bo ec cev .
SFX Bo ec cu .
SFX Bo ec cah .
SFX Bo ec cam .
SFX Bo ec cem .
SFX Bo ec cami .
SFX Bo ec če .
