isv_lat_hunspell_dict.dic
ostati/Bd
vzeti/Be
dvigati se/Bf
dvoje/Bg
posrědnji/Bh
krot/Bi
česnok/Bj
gaslo/Bk
mekky/Bl
voziti/Bm
jedin/Bn
konec/Bo
vozdržati se/Bf
čislo/Bk
věnec/Bo
izobraziti/Bm
legky/Bl
neporedok/Bj
uraziti/Bm
obstanavjati se/Bf
sumrkati se/Bf
spuščati se/Bf
srědnji/Bh
remeslo/Bk
okazyvati se/Bf
usměhati se/Bf
bezposrědnji/Bh
dostati/Bd
zamraziti/Bm
zagroziti/Bm
razpadati se/Bf
grnec/Bo
poslědnji/Bh
vměšati se/Bf
vměšivati se/Bf
groziti/Bm
izraziti/Bm
krěslo/Bk
maslo/Bk
vozdrživati se/Bf
stati/Bd
raztegati se/Bf
poraziti/Bm
odpočinok/Bj
razsudok/Bj
sumněvati se/Bf
nijedin/Bn
udivjati se/Bf
izjavjati se/Bf
privoziti/Bm
starějši/Bh
starši/Bh
javjati se/Bf
prědnji/Bh
napravjati se/Bf
vživati se/Bf
sjedinjati se/Bf
izravnjati se/Bf
sbirati se/Bf
poddavati se/Bf
mraziti/Bm
prědposlědnji/Bh
ogroziti/Bm
skladati se/Bf
uniziti/Bm
prizemjati se/Bf
odkazyvati se/Bf
omrziti/Bm
različati se/Bf
izdavati se/Bf
zadnji/Bh
obnažati se/Bf
podsměhati se/Bf
prěvoziti/Bm
vvoziti/Bm
odvoziti/Bm
izvoziti/Bm
načinati se/Bf
dogovarjati se/Bf
odraziti/Bm
upivati se/Bf
vlamyvati se/Bf
natolkati se/Bf
sniziti/Bm
zaustavjati se/Bf
začrvenjati se/Bf
neposrědnji/Bh
razgledati se/Bf
priučati se/Bf
izbavjati se/Bf
prošlogodišnji/Bh
izradžati se/Bf
pridrživati se/Bf
prěměščati se/Bf
dorazuměti se/Bf
dorazuměvati se/Bf
dovoziti/Bm
gněvati se/Bf
jutrišnji/Bh
utrišnji/Bh
každogodišnji/Bh
kurec/Bo
najstarějši/Bh
najstarši/Bh
objavjati se/Bf
odpirati se/Bf
počinati se/Bf
poručati se/Bf
prěobraziti/Bm
privykati se/Bf
vsakogodišnji/Bh
zapisyvati se/Bf
zautrišnji/Bh
sdavati se/Bf
godišnji/Bh
zanedbati se/Bf
zanedbyvati se/Bf
ranec/Bo
nazyvati se/Bf
pojavjati se/Bf
troje/Bg
oboje/Bg
odbyvati se/Bf
vněšnji/Bh
posluživati se/Bf
čuvati se/Bf
dnešnji/Bh
domašnji/Bh
dosadžati se/Bf
hvastati se/Bf
izgnanec/Bo
jalovec/Bo
kolokrěslo/Bk
lanec/Bo
obrazec/Bo
odjavjati se/Bf
osvobadžati se/Bf
poděti se/Bf
poděvati se/Bf
podobati se/Bf
prěměnjati se/Bf
približati se/Bf
prijavjati se/Bf
prijmati se/Bf
pritvarjati se/Bf
sběgati se/Bf
sbližati se/Bf
sklanjati se/Bf
skryvati se/Bf
slivati se/Bf
soglašati se/Bf
suglašati se/Bf
trimati se/Bf
udržati se/Bf
udrživati se/Bf
upodabnjati se/Bf
uvaljnjati se/Bf
uvaljnjati se/Bf
zadrživati se/Bf
zajmati se/Bf
zasmějati se/Bf
klanjati se/Bf
laziti/Bm
nyněšnji/Bh
obniziti/Bm
odigrati se/Bf
odigryvati se/Bf
poprědnji/Bh
valec/Bo
domysljati se/Bf
izslavjati se/Bf
porazuměti se/Bf
porazuměvati se/Bf
razlegati se/Bf
skladati se/Bf
slučati se/Bf
smalec/Bo
opirati se/Bf
praščati se/Bf
prěpirati se/Bf
spirati se/Bf
zaraziti/Bm
dovědati se/Bf
kolěbati se/Bf
obrušati se/Bf
odrěkati se/Bf
pogruziti/Bm
postarati se/Bf
prěrěkati se/Bf
raziti/Bm
razsvětljati se/Bf
ssědati se/Bf
starati se/Bf
utračati se/Bf
vagati se/Bf
zarěkati se/Bf
zaručati se/Bf
nastati/Bd
prěstavjati se/Bf
razstavati se/Bf
razstati se/Bf
vnutrišnji/Bh
vračati se/Bf
obračati se/Bf
obračati se/Bf
soobčati se/Bf
razmraziti/Bm
odključati se/Bf
končati se/Bf
tanec/Bo
razvivati se/Bf
svěrjati se/Bf
prěhladžati se/Bf
osvědamjati se/Bf
ruměnec/Bo
protegati se/Bf
bližnji/Bh
bodec/Bo
brahtati se/Bf
bratati se/Bf
čepec/Bo
daljnji/Bh
gostinec/Bo
jesennji/Bh
kajati se/Bf
kaziti/Bm
kladec/Bo
kolzati se/Bf
kupati se/Bf
lětnji/Bh
izlišnji/Bh
naběgati se/Bf
načitati se/Bf
nasěděti se/Bf
naslušati se/Bf
nastradati se/Bf
objedati se/Bf
obuvati se/Bf
obzirati se/Bf
obžirati se/Bf
odražati se/Bf
ostrěgati se/Bf
odzyvati se/Bf
prěstarati se/Bf
razběgati se/Bf
razgarjati se/Bf
razgorěti se/Bf
razigrati se/Bf
razježdžati se/Bf
razkajati se/Bf
razlajati se/Bf
razlětati se/Bf
razprostirati se/Bf
razrastati se/Bf
razsmějati se/Bf
raztěkati se/Bf
razuvati se/Bf
valjati se/Bf
veslo/Bk
zajikati se/Bf
zubec/Bo
izcěljati se/Bf
bodati se/Bf
pokajati se/Bf
ledovec/Bo
izvinjati se/Bf
najedati se/Bf
opivati se/Bf
phati se/Bf
měnjati se/Bf
napivati se/Bf
prěseljati se/Bf
srastati se/Bf
nasladžati se/Bf
razmnažati se/Bf
hihotati se/Bf
prostudžati se/Bf
smrkati se/Bf
vysmrkati se/Bf
razbolěvati se/Bf
razděti se/Bf
razděvati se/Bf
razigryvati se/Bf
razkručati se/Bf
razprostranjati se/Bf
razpaljati se/Bf
razvaljati se/Bf
razvoziti/Bm
odbivati se/Bf
odprašati se/Bf
obtirati se/Bf
poscati se/Bf
odčajivati se/Bf
oddaljati se/Bf
odklejati se/Bf
odlěpjati se/Bf
odpravjati se/Bf
operjati se/Bf
opozdnjati se/Bf
spozdnjati se/Bf
osměljati se/Bf
trizubec/Bo
poniziti/Bm
razplyvati se/Bf
koverec/Bo
onogdašnji/Bh
susrědotočati se/Bf
udavati se/Bf
vgledati se/Bf
prigadžati se/Bf
segdašnji/Bh
včerašnji/Bh
prěoděvati se/Bf
prěoděti se/Bf
palec/Bo
sdešnji/Bh
prodirati se/Bf
probijati se/Bf
soočati se/Bf
suočati se/Bf
drobjenec/Bo
krajec/Bo
pozyvati se/Bf
pozvati se/Bf
odvykati se/Bf
prěkryvati se/Bf
razširjati se/Bf
strěčati se/Bf
izseljati se/Bf
zadovaljati se/Bf
proščati se/Bf
spodobati se/Bf
proslavjati se/Bf
prigledati se/Bf
ubědžati se/Bf
uvěrjati se/Bf
izražati se/Bf
dověrjati se/Bf
prilučati se/Bf
podključati se/Bf
prisjedinjati se/Bf
